Maryland, session 2026, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.12.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–101 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “TUITION” MEANS THE CHARGES IMPOSED BY A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION FOR ENROLLMENT AT THE INSTITUTION.
(II) “TUITION” INCLUDES CHARGES FOR REGISTRATION AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1313*

HOUSE BILL 1313
ALL FEES REQUIRED AS A CONDITION OF ENROLLMENT IN CREDIT–BEARING AND
NONCREDIT COURSES OFFERED DURING THE FALL, WINTER, SPRING, OR SUMMER
TERM.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS EXEMPT FROM PAYING ANY TUITION AT A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE REGARDLESS OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S RECEIPT OF ANY SCHOLARSHIP OR GRANT.
(C) (1) IN ORDER TO RECEIVE THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION, AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SHALL SUBMIT A TIMELY APPLICATION FOR ANY STATE
OR FEDERAL STUDENT FINANCIAL AID, OTHER THAN A STUDENT LOAN, FOR WHICH
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL MAY QUALIFY.
(2) ANY STUDENT FINANCIAL AID, OTHER THAN A STUDENT LOAN,
RECEIVED BY THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE APPLIED FIRST TO PAY
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TUITION.
(3) THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO THE
DIFFERENCE, IF ANY, BETWEEN THE CHARGE FOR TUITION AND THE FINANCIAL AID
AWARD, NOT INCLUDING A STUDENT LOAN, THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
RECEIVES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.